Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Common Interest Communities.

Sec. 34.08.090.
Creation of common interest communities.

A common interest community may be created under this chapter only by recording a declaration executed in the same manner as a deed and, in a cooperative, by conveying the real estate subject to the declaration to the association. The declaration must be recorded, and a plat or plan that is part of the declaration filed and recorded, in each recording district in which a portion of the common interest community is located and must be indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the common interest community and the association and in the grantor’s index in the name of each person executing the declaration.

In a condominium, a declaration or an amendment to a declaration that adds a unit may not be recorded, and a plat or plan that is part of the declaration may not be filed or recorded, unless the structural components and mechanical systems of each building containing or comprising a unit of the condominium are completed substantially in accordance with the plans, as evidenced by a certificate of completion recorded with the declaration or amendment to the declaration and executed by

an independent registered engineer, architect, or land surveyor;

an appraiser with the designation of senior residential appraiser, senior real property appraiser, or senior real estate analyst of the Society of Real Estate Appraisers;

a residential member, or member of the appraisal institute, of the American Institute of Real Estate Appraisers; or

an individual with a designation established by regulation of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for fee appraisers who certify the completion of construction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 12 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.100.
Unit boundaries.

Except as provided by the declaration

if walls, floors, or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a unit, the lath, furring, wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, finished flooring, and other materials constituting a part of the finished surfaces of the walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the unit, and all other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the common elements;

if a chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or other fixture lies partially within and partially outside the designated boundaries of a unit, the portion serving only the unit is a limited common element allocated solely to the unit, and any portion serving more than one unit or a portion of the common elements is a part of the common elements;

subject to (2) of this section, spaces, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are a part of the unit;

shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, decks, balconies, patios, and each exterior door and window or other fixture designed to serve a single unit that is located outside the boundaries of the unit, are limited common elements allocated exclusively to the unit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.110.
Construction and validity of declaration and bylaws.

Each provision of the declaration and bylaws is severable.

The rule against perpetuities does not defeat any provision of the declaration, bylaws, rules, or regulations adopted under AS

34.08.320(a)(1)

.

In a conflict between the provisions of the declaration and the bylaws, the declaration prevails unless the declaration is inconsistent with this chapter.

Title to a unit and common elements is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by reason of an insubstantial failure of the declaration to comply with this chapter. Whether a substantial failure impairs marketability is not affected by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.120.
Description of units.

A description of a unit that sets out the name of the common interest community, the recording data for the declaration, the recording district in which the common interest community is located, and the identifying number of the unit, is a legally sufficient description of the unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to the unit that were created by the declaration or bylaws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.130.
Contents of declaration.

The declaration must contain

the names of the common interest community and the association and a statement that the common interest community is either a condominium, cooperative, or planned community;

the name of each recording district in which a part of the common interest community is situated;

a legally sufficient description of the real estate included in the common interest community;

a statement of the maximum number of units that the declarant reserves the right to create;

in a condominium or planned community, a description of the boundaries of each unit created by the declaration, including the identifying number of the unit, or in a cooperative, a description, which may be by plats or plans, of each unit created by the declaration, including the identifying number of the unit, its size or number of rooms, and its location within a building if it is within a building containing more than one unit;

a description of any limited common elements, other than those specified in AS

34.08.100

(2) and (4) or

34.08.170

(b)(10) and, in a planned community, any real estate that is or must become common elements;

a description of any real estate, except real estate subject to development rights, that may be allocated subsequently as limited common elements, other than limited common elements specified in AS

34.08.100

(2) and (4), together with a statement that the designated real estate may be allocated;

a description of any development rights or other special declarant rights reserved by the declarant, together with a legally sufficient description of the real estate to which each of the rights applies, and a time limit within which each of the rights must be exercised;

if a development right may be exercised with respect to different parcels of real estate at different times, a statement to that effect together with

either a statement fixing the boundaries of the portions and regulating the order in which the portions may be subjected to the exercise of each development right or a statement that assurances are not made with regard to matters under this paragraph; and

a statement as to whether, if a development right is exercised in a portion of the real estate subject to the development right, the development right must be exercised in all or in any other portion of the remainder of that real estate;

any other condition or limitation under which the rights described in (8) of this subsection may be exercised or will lapse;

an allocation to each unit of the allocated interests in the manner described in AS

34.08.150

;

any restrictions

on use, occupancy, and alienation of the units, and

on the amount for which a unit may be sold or on the amount that may be received by a unit owner on sale, condemnation, or casualty loss to the unit or to the common interest community, or on termination of the common interest community;

the recording data for recorded easements and licenses appurtenant to or included in the common interest community or to which any portion of the common interest community is or may become subject by virtue of a reservation in the declaration; and

each matter required by AS

34.08.140

,

34.08.150

,

34.08.160

,

34.08.170

,

34.08.230

,

34.08.240

and

34.08.330(d)

.

A declaration may contain other matters the declarant considers appropriate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.140.
Leasehold common interest communities.

If the expiration or termination of a lease or a memorandum of the lease will terminate the common interest community or reduce its size, the lease or a memorandum of the lease must be recorded. In a condominium or planned community, the lessor of each lease described in this subsection shall sign the declaration. The declaration must state

the recording data for the lease or a summary of the complete lease;

the date on which the lease is scheduled to expire;

a legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease;

any right of the unit owners to redeem the reversion and the manner in which the rights may be exercised, or a statement that the unit owners do not have a right to redeem the reversion;

any right of the unit owners to remove any improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease, or a statement that the unit owners do not have the right to remove improvements after the expiration or termination of the lease; and

any right of the unit owners to renew the lease and the conditions of the renewal, or a statement that the unit owners do not have the right to renew the lease.

After the declaration for a leasehold condominium or leasehold planned community is recorded, and a plat or plan that is part of the declaration is filed and recorded, neither the lessor nor the successor in interest of the lessor may terminate the leasehold interest of a unit owner who makes timely payment of a unit owner’s share of the rent and otherwise complies with the covenants that, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. The leasehold interest of a unit owner in a condominium or planned community is not affected by the failure of any other person to pay rent or fulfill a covenant.

The acquisition of the leasehold interest of a unit owner by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and fee simple interests unless the leasehold interests of all unit owners subject to that reversion or remainder are acquired.

If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a common interest community, the allocated interests must be reallocated under AS

34.08.740(a)

as if the units had been taken by eminent domain. The reallocation must be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association of unit owners; a plat or plan that accompanies the amendment must be filed and recorded with the amendment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am §§ 13, 14 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.150.
Allocation of allocated interests.

The declaration must allocate

to each unit in a condominium, a fraction or percentage of undivided interests in the common elements and in the common expenses of the association and a portion of the votes in the association;

to each unit in a cooperative, an ownership interest in the association, a fraction or percentage of the common expenses of the association and a portion of the votes in the association; and

to each unit in a planned community, a fraction or percentage of the common expenses of the association and a portion of the votes in the association.

The declaration must state the formulas used to establish allocations of interests. The allocations may not discriminate in favor of units owned by the declarant or an affiliate of the declarant.

If a unit may be added to or withdrawn from the common interest community, the declaration must state the formulas to be used to reallocate the allocated interests among the units included in the common interest community after the addition or withdrawal.

The declaration may provide (1) that different allocations of votes shall be made to the units on particular matters specified in the declaration; (2) for cumulative voting only for the purpose of electing members of the executive board; and (3) for class voting on specified issues affecting the class if necessary to protect valid interests of the class. A declarant may not utilize cumulative or class voting for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by this chapter nor may units constitute a class because they are owned by a declarant.

Except for minor variations due to rounding, the sum of the common expense liabilities and, in a condominium, the sum of the undivided interests in the common elements allocated at any time to all the units must each equal one if stated as a fraction or 100 percent if stated as a percentage. In the event of discrepancy between an allocated interest and the result derived from application of the pertinent formula, the allocated interest prevails.

In a condominium, the common elements are not subject to partition, and any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an undivided interest in the common elements made without the unit to which that interest is allocated is void.

In a cooperative, any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an ownership interest in the association made without the possessory interest in the unit to which that interest is related is void.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.160.
Limited common elements.

Except for the limited common elements described in AS

34.08.100

(2) and (4), the declaration must specify to which unit or units each limited common element is allocated. An allocation may not be altered without the consent of the unit owners whose units are affected.

Except as the declaration otherwise provides, a limited common element may be reallocated by an amendment to the declaration executed by the unit owners between or among whose units the reallocation is made. The persons executing the amendment shall provide a copy of the amendment to the association, which shall record the amendment and file and record a plat or plan that accompanies the amendment. The amendment must be recorded, and an accompanying plat or plan filed and recorded, in the names of the parties and the common interest community.

A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element may be allocated as a limited common element only under provisions in the declaration adopted under AS

34.08.130(a)(7)

. The allocation must be made by an amendment to the declaration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 15 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.170.
Plats and plans.

Plats and plans are a part of the declaration and are required for all common interest communities except cooperatives. Separate plats and plans are not required by this chapter if the information required by this section is contained in either a plat or plan. Each plat and plan must be clear and legible and contain a certification that the plat or plan contains the information required by this section.

Each plat must show

the name and a survey or general schematic map of the entire common interest community;

the location and dimensions of the real estate not subject to development rights or subject only to the development right to withdraw, and the location and dimensions of each existing improvement within the real estate;

a legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to development rights, labeled to identify the rights applicable to each parcel;

the extent of each encroachment by or upon a portion of the common interest community;

to the extent feasible, a legally sufficient description of each easement serving or burdening a portion of the common interest community;

the location and dimensions of any vertical unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans filed and recorded under (d) of this section and the identifying number of the unit;

the location with reference to an established datum of any horizontal unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans filed and recorded under (d) of this section and the identifying number of the unit;

a legally sufficient description of any real estate in which the unit owners will own only an estate for years, labeled as “leasehold real estate”;

the distance between noncontiguous parcels of real estate comprising the common interest community;

the location and dimensions of limited common elements, including porches, decks, balconies, and patios, other than parking spaces and the other limited common elements described in AS

34.08.100

(2) and (4);

in the case of real estate not subject to development rights, all other matters customarily shown on land surveys.

A plat may also show the intended location and dimensions of a contemplated improvement to be constructed within the common interest community. A contemplated improvement shown must be labeled either “MUST BE BUILT” or “NEED NOT BE BUILT.”

To the extent not shown or projected on the plats, plans of the units must show or project

the location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit, and the identifying number of the unit;

any horizontal unit boundaries, with reference to an established datum, and the identifying number of the unit; and

each unit in which the declarant has reserved the right to create additional units or common elements, identified appropriately.

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, the horizontal boundaries of part of a unit located outside a building have the same elevation as the horizontal boundaries of the inside part and need not be depicted on the plats and plans.

Upon the exercise of a development right, the declarant shall either file and record new plats and plans necessary to conform to the requirements of (a), (b), and (d) of this section, or file and record new certifications of plats and plans previously filed and recorded if the plats and plans otherwise conform to the requirements of (a), (b), and (d) of this section.

A certification of a plat or plan required by this section or AS

34.08.090(b)

shall be made by an independent registered surveyor, architect, or engineer.

The state recorder shall prescribe the style, size, form, and quality of plats and plans filed and recorded under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am §§ 16 — 18 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.180.
Exercise of development rights.

To exercise a development right reserved under AS

34.08.130(a)(8)

, a declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration, file and record a plat or plan that accompanies the amendment, and, in a condominium or planned community, comply with AS

34.08.170

. The declarant is the unit owner of the units created under the amendment. The amendment to the declaration must assign an identifying number to each new unit created, and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of units described in (b) of this section, reallocate the allocated interests among all units. The amendment must describe common elements and any limited common elements created under the amendment and, in the case of limited common elements, designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required by AS

34.08.160

.

A development right may be reserved within any real estate added to the common interest community if the amendment adding the real estate includes the matters required by AS

34.08.130

or

34.08.140

, and, in a condominium or planned community, if the plats and plans include the matters required by AS

34.08.170

. This provision does not extend the time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration under AS

34.08.130(a)(8)

.

Whenever a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit previously created into additional units, common elements, or both,

if the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the other units as if that unit had been taken by eminent domain; and

if the declarant subdivides the unit into two or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the units created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

If the declaration under AS

34.08.130(a)(8)

provides that all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a right of withdrawal:

if all of the real estate is subject to withdrawal and the declaration does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to the right, none of the real estate may be withdrawn after a unit has been conveyed to a purchaser; and

if a portion is subject to withdrawal, it may not be withdrawn after a unit in the portion has been conveyed to a purchaser.

A declarant may terminate development rights by an amendment to the declaration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 19 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.190.
Alterations of units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, a unit owner (1) may make an improvement or alteration to the unit that does not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of a portion of the common interest community; (2) may not change the appearance of the common elements or the exterior appearance of a unit or any portion of the common interest community without permission of the association; (3) after acquiring an adjoining unit or an adjoining part of an adjoining unit, may remove or alter an intervening partition or create apertures in the partition even if the partition in whole or in part is a common element, if the removal or alteration does not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of a portion of the common interest community and is completed according to applicable codes and in a skillful and workmanlike manner. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this paragraph is not an alteration of boundaries.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.200.
Relocation of boundaries between adjoining units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the owners of the units. If the owners of the adjoining units have specified a reallocation between their units of their allocated interests, the application must state the proposed reallocations. Unless the executive board determines within 30 days that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association shall prepare an amendment that identifies the units involved and states the reallocations. The amendment must be executed by those unit owners, contain words of conveyance between them, and, on recording, be indexed in the name of the grantor, the grantee, and the association.

The association

in a condominium or planned community shall prepare, file, and record plats or plans necessary to show the altered boundaries between adjoining units, and their dimensions and identifying numbers; and

in a cooperative shall prepare and record amendments to the declaration, and file and record a plat or plan necessary to show or describe the altered boundaries between adjoining units and their dimensions and identifying numbers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 20 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.210.
Subdivision of units.

If the declaration expressly permits it, a unit may be subdivided into two or more units. Upon application of a unit owner to subdivide a unit, the association shall, subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration subdividing the unit, including in a condominium or planned community filing and recording a plat or plan that accompanies the amendment.

The amendment to the declaration must be executed by the owner of the unit to be subdivided, assign an identifying number to each unit created, and reallocate the allocated interests formerly allocated to the subdivided unit to the new units in any reasonable manner prescribed by the owner of the subdivided unit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 21 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.220.
Easement for encroachments.

If a unit or common element encroaches on another unit or common element, a valid easement for the encroachment exists. The easement does not relieve a unit owner of liability in case of wilful misconduct nor relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to any plats and plans or, in a cooperative, to any representation in the public offering statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.230.
Use for sales purposes.

A declarant may maintain sales offices, management offices, and models in units or on common elements in the common interest community only if the declaration permits it and specifies the rights of a declarant with regard to their number, size, location, and relocation. In a cooperative or condominium, a sales office, management office, or model not designated a unit by the declaration is a common element. A declarant who ceases to be a unit owner ceases to have any rights under this section unless the unit is removed promptly from the common interest community under a right to remove reserved in the declaration. A declarant may maintain signs on the common elements advertising the common interest community subject to any limitations in the declaration.

Rights granted under this section are subject to state law and to municipal ordinance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.240.
Easement rights.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, a declarant has an easement through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging the declarant’s obligations or exercising special declarant rights, whether arising under this chapter or reserved in the declaration.

In a planned community, subject to the provisions of AS

34.08.320(a)(6)

and

34.08.430

, a unit owner has an easement

in the common elements for purposes of access to their units; and

to use the common elements and all real estate that must become common elements for all other purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

What constitutes, and remedies for, misuse of easement.
111 ALR5th 313.

Sec. 34.08.250.
Amendment of declaration.

Except for amendments that may be executed by a declarant under AS

34.08.170(b)

or

34.08.180

, by the association under AS

34.08.140(d)

,

34.08.160(c)

,

34.08.200(a)

,

34.08.210

, or

34.08.740

, or by certain unit owners under AS

34.08.160(b)

,

34.08.200(a)

,

34.08.210

(b), or

34.08.260(b)

, and except as limited by (d) or required by (f) of this section, a declaration, including any required plats and plans, may be amended only by vote or agreement of unit owners of units comprising either at least 67 percent of the allocated interests in the association or a larger percentage specified in the declaration. A declaration may not specify a smaller number unless all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.

An action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the association under this section may not be brought more than one year after the amendment is recorded.

Each amendment to the declaration must be recorded, and a plat or plan that accompanies the amendment filed and recorded, in each recording district in which a portion of the common interest community is located and the amendment is effective only upon recording. An amendment, except an amendment under AS

34.08.200(a)

, must be indexed in the name of the common interest community and the association and in the name of the parties executing the amendment.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required in this chapter, an amendment may not create or increase special declarant rights, increase the number of units, or change the boundaries of a unit, the allocated interests of a unit, or the uses to which a unit is restricted, in the absence of unanimous consent of the unit owners.

An amendment to the declaration required by this chapter to be recorded by the association must be prepared, executed, recorded, and certified on behalf of the association by an officer of the association designated for that purpose or, in the absence of designation, by the president of the association.

The time limits specified in a declaration described under AS

34.08.130(a)(8)

may be extended and additional development rights created if persons entitled to cast at least 80 percent of the votes in the association, including 80 percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by the declarant, agree to the extension or additional development rights. The agreement is effective 30 days after an amendment to the declaration reflecting the terms of the agreement is recorded unless all persons holding special declarant rights affected by the amendment or security interests in those rights

record a written objection within the 30-day period, in which case, the amendment is void; or

consent in writing when the amendment is recorded, in which case, the amendment is effective when recorded.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 22 ch 161 SLA 1988; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 29 SLA 2012)

Sec. 34.08.255.
Amendment of a declaration where fewer than 50 percent of unit owners approve.

If a declaration requires owners having more than 50 percent of the votes in the association in a single class voting structure or unit owners having more than 50 percent of the votes in more than one class in a voting structure with more than one class to vote in favor of an amendment in order to amend a declaration, the association or a unit owner may petition the superior court for the judicial district in which the common interest community is located for an order reducing the percentage of the affirmative votes necessary for the adoption of the amendment. The petition shall describe the efforts that have been made to solicit the approval of the unit owners in the association in the manner required by the declaration, the number of affirmative and negative votes actually received, the number of percentage of affirmative votes required to adopt the amendment under the declaration, and any other matter the petitioner considers relevant to the determination of the court. The petition must include as exhibits to the petition a copy of

the governing documents;

a complete text of the amendments;

a copy of each notice and the solicitation materials used in the solicitation of the approval of the amendment by the unit owners;

an explanation of the reason for the amendment;

other documentation relevant to the determination by the court.

When the petition is filed with the superior court, the court shall set the matter for hearing and issue an ex parte order setting out the manner in which notice shall be given to the unit owners in the association.

The court may, but is not required to, grant the petition if it finds that

the petitioner has given not less than 15 days’ written notice of the court hearing to

each unit owner in the association;

a mortgagee of a mortgage or beneficiary of a deed of trust that is entitled to notice under the provisions of the declaration; and

the municipality in which the common interest community is located if it is entitled to notice under the declaration;

the balloting on the proposed amendment was conducted under each of the applicable provisions of the declaration, bylaws, and rules or regulations of the association;

a reasonably diligent effort was made to permit each eligible unit owner to vote on the proposed amendment;

in a common interest community with a single class voting structure, unit owners with more than 50 percent of the votes voted in favor of the amendment;

in a voting structure with more than one class and where the declaration requires a majority of more than one class to vote in favor of the amendment, unit owners having more than 50 percent of the votes in each class required by the declaration to vote in favor of the amendment did vote in favor of the amendment;

the amendment is reasonable; and

granting the petition is appropriate considering the circumstances.

If the court makes the findings required in (c) of this section, an order issued under this section may

confirm the amendment as being validly approved on the basis of the affirmative votes actually received during the balloting period; or

dispense with a requirement relating to quorums or to the percentage of votes needed for approval of an amendment under the governing documents.

A court may not approve an amendment to a declaration under this section that

would change the provision in a declaration requiring the approval of unit owners having more than 50 percent of the votes in more than one class to vote in favor of an amendment unless more than 50 percent of the unit owners in each affected class of unit owners approve the amendment;

would eliminate a special right, preference, or privilege designated in the declaration as belonging to the declarant without the approval of the declarant; or

would impair the security interest of a mortgagee of a mortgage or the beneficiary of a deed of trust without the approval of the percentage of the mortgagees and beneficiaries specified in the declaration if the declaration requires the approval of a specified percentage of the mortgagees and beneficiaries.

An amendment to the declaration approved under this section is not effective until the order of the court and the amendment have been recorded in each recording district in which a portion of the common interest community is located. The amendment may be acknowledged by, and the court order and amendment may be recorded by, an individual designated in the declaration or by the association and, if no one is designated for that purpose, by the president of the association. On the recording of the amendment and the court order, the declaration, as amended under this section, has the same force and effect as if the amendment were adopted in compliance with the declaration.

Within a reasonable time after the recording of the amendment under (f) of this section, the association shall mail a copy of the amendment to each unit owner in the association together with a statement that the amendment has been recorded.

History.

(§ 5 ch 61 SLA 1986)